North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 7. Organization.
District 12C: Cumberland County: VTD: AL51, VTD: CC04, VTD: CC06, VTD: CC07, VTD: CC08, VTD: CC10, VTD: CC12, VTD: CC13: Block(s) 0510009004000, 0510009004020; VTD: CC14, VTD: CC15: Block(s) 0510006001000, 0510006001001, 0510006001002, 0510006001003, 0510006001004, 0510006001005, 0510006001006, 0510006001007, 0510006001008, 0510006001009, 0510006001010, 0510006001011, 0510006001012, 0510006001013, 0510006001014, 0510006001015, 0510006001016, 0510006002000, 0510006002001, 0510006002002, 0510006002003, 0510006002004, 0510006002005, 0510006002006, 0510006002007, 0510006002008, 0510006002009, 0510018001000, 0510018001001, 0510018001002, 0510018001003, 0510018001004, 0510018001005, 0510018001006, 0510018001007, 0510018001008, 0510018001009, 0510018002000, 0510018002001, 0510018002002, 0510038003035; VTD: CC18: 0510007022006, 0510007022010, 0510007022011, 0510007022013, 0510007022014, 0510007022015, 0510007022016, 0510007022017, 0510007022018, 0510007022019, 0510007022020, 0510007022021, 0510007022022, 0510007022023, 0510007022024, 0510007022025, 0510007022026, 0510038003030, 0510038003031, 0510038003032, 0510038003055; VTD: CC21, VTD: CC24: Block(s) 0510020011006, 0510020011007, 0510020011008, 0510020011010, 0510020011011, 0510020011012, 0510020011013, 0510020011014, 0510020011015, 0510020011016, 0510020011025, 0510020011026, 0510020011030, 0510020011031, 0510020011032, 0510020011033, 0510020011034, 0510020011035, 0510020011036, 0510020011037, 0510020011038, 0510020011039, 0510020011040, 0510020011041, 0510020011042, 0510020011043, 0510020011044, 0510020011045, 0510020011046, 0510020011047, 0510020011048, 0510020011049, 0510020011050, 0510020011051, 0510020011052, 0510020011053, 0510020011055, 0510020011056, 0510020012000, 0510020012001, 0510020012002, 0510020012003, 0510020012006, 0510020012007, 0510020012008, 0510020012009, 0510020012010, 0510020012011, 0510020012012, 0510020012013, 0510020012014, 0510020012015, 0510020012016, 0510020012017, 0510020012018, 0510020012019, 0510020012021, 0510020012022, 0510020012023, 0510020012024, 0510020021001; VTD: CC26, VTD: EO61-1, VTD: EO61-2, VTD: G1, VTD: G10: Block(s) 0510031031000, 0510031031011, 0510031031012, 0510031031013, 0510031031014, 0510031031015, 0510031031017, 0510031031018, 0510031031019, 0510031031020, 0510031031021, 0510031031022, 0510031032000, 0510031032001, 0510031032002, 0510031032003, 0510031032016, 0510031032022, 0510031032025, 0510031032030, 0510031032031, 0510031032032, 0510031032033, 0510031032035, 0510031032037, 0510031032038, 0510031032039, 0510031032040, 0510031032045, 0510031032050, 0510031032051; VTD: G11: 0510036001000, 0510036001001, 0510036001002, 0510036001003, 0510036001004, 0510036001005, 0510036001006, 0510036001007, 0510036001008, 0510036001009, 0510036001010, 0510036001012, 0510036001013, 0510036001014, 0510036001015, 0510036001016, 0510036001017, 0510036001019, 0510036001021, 0510036001022, 0510036001039, 0510036001040, 0510036001041, 0510036001042, 0510036003000, 0510036003001, 0510036003002, 0510036003003, 0510036003004, 0510036003005, 0510036003006, 0510036003007, 0510036003008, 0510036003009, 0510036003010, 0510036003011, 0510036003012, 0510036003014, 0510036003015, 0510036003016, 0510036003017, 0510036003018, 0510036003019, 0510036003020, 0510036003021, 0510036003022, 0510036003023, 0510036003024, 0510036003025, 0510036003026, 0510036003027, 0510036003028, 0510036003029, 0510036003030, 0510036003031, 0510036003032, 0510036003033, 0510036003035, 0510036003037, 0510036003038, 0510036003039, 0510036003040, 0510036003041, 0510036003042, 0510036003043, 0510036003044, 0510036003045, 0510036003046, 0510036003047, 0510036003048, 0510036003049, 0510036003050, 0510036003051, 0510036004000, 0510036004001, 0510036004048, 0510037001007, 0510037001008, 0510037001009, 0519801001000, 0519801001001, 0519801001002, 0519801001003, 0519801001004, 0519801001007, 0519801001008, 0519801001010, 0519801001011, 0519801001012, 0519801001013, 0519801001014, 0519801001015, 0519801001016; VTD: G2: 0510012004001, 0510012004002, 0510012004003, 0510012004004, 0510012004021, 0510012004022, 0510012004023, 0510012004024, 0510012004025, 0510012004026, 0510012004027, 0510012004028, 0510024011000, 0510024011001, 0510024011002, 0510024011003, 0510024011004, 0510024011005, 0510024011006, 0510024011007, 0510024011008, 0510024011009, 0510024011010, 0510024011011, 0510024011013, 0510024011014, 0510024011015, 0510024011016, 0510024011017, 0510024011018, 0510024011019, 0510024011022, 0510024011024, 0510024011025, 0510024011026, 0510024011027, 0510024011028, 0510024011029, 0510024011030, 0510024011034, 0510024011035, 0510024011036, 0510024011038, 0510024011041, 0510024011042, 0510024011043, 0510024012004, 0510024012007, 0510024012025, 0510024021000, 0510024021005, 0510024022000, 0510024022001, 0510024022004, 0510024022007, 0510025011000, 0510025011001, 0510025011002, 0510025011003, 0510025011004, 0510025011005, 0510025011006, 0510025011007, 0510025011008, 0510025011009, 0510025011010, 0510025011011, 0510025011012, 0510025011013, 0510025011014, 0510025011015, 0510025011016, 0510025011017, 0510025011018, 0510025011019, 0510025011020, 0510025011021, 0510025011022, 0510025011023, 0510025012000, 0510025012001, 0510025012002, 0510025012003, 0510025012004, 0510025012005, 0510025012006, 0510025012007, 0510025012008, 0510025012009, 0510025012010, 0510025012011, 0510025012012, 0510025012013, 0510025012014, 0510025013000, 0510025013001, 0510025013002, 0510025013003, 0510025013004, 0510025013005, 0510025013006, 0510025013007, 0510025013008, 0510025013014, 0510025013015, 0510025013016, 0510025013017, 0510025013020, 0510025013023, 0510025013031, 0510025013033, 0510025013037, 0510025013038, 0510025013039, 0510025013040, 0510025013053, 0510025013054, 0510025013055, 0510025013056, 0510025013057, 0510025013058, 0510025013059, 0510025013060, 0510025013061, 0510025013062, 0510025013066, 0510025013067, 0510025013069, 0510025013070, 0510025013077, 0510025013078, 0510025013079, 0510025013080, 0510025013081, 0510025021000, 0510025021001, 0510025021002, 0510025021003, 0510025021004, 0510025021005, 0510025021006, 0510025021007, 0510025021008, 0510025021009, 0510025021010, 0510025021011, 0510025021012, 0510025021013, 0510025021014, 0510025021015, 0510025021016, 0510025021017, 0510025021018, 0510025021019, 0510025021020, 0510025021021, 0510025021022, 0510025021023, 0510025021024, 0510025021025, 0510025021026, 0510025021027, 0510025021028, 0510025021029, 0510025021030, 0510025021031, 0510025021032, 0510025021033, 0510025021034, 0510025021035, 0510025021036, 0510025021037, 0510025021038, 0510025021039, 0510025021040, 0510025021041, 0510025021042, 0510025021043, 0510025021044, 0510025021045, 0510025021046, 0510025021047, 0510025021048, 0510025021049, 0510025021050, 0510025021051, 0510025021052, 0510025021053, 0510025021054, 0510025021055, 0510025021056, 0510025021057, 0510025021058, 0510025021059, 0510025021060, 0510025021061, 0510025021062, 0510025021063, 0510025021064, 0510025021065, 0510025021066, 0510025021067, 0510025022000, 0510025022001, 0510025022002, 0510025022003, 0510025022004, 0510025022005, 0510025022006, 0510025022007, 0510025022008, 0510025022009, 0510025022010, 0510025022011, 0510025022012, 0510025022013, 0510025022014, 0510025022015, 0510025022016, 0510025022017, 0510025022018, 0510025022019, 0510025022020, 0510025022021, 0510025022022, 0510025022023, 0510025022024, 0510025022025, 0510025022026, 0510025022027, 0510025022028, 0510025022029, 0510025022030, 0510025022031, 0510025022032, 0510025022033, 0510025022034, 0510025022035, 0510025022036, 0510025022037, 0510025022038, 0510025022039, 0510025022040, 0510025022041, 0510025022042, 0510025022043, 0510025022044, 0510025022045, 0510025022046, 0510025022047, 0510025022048, 0510025022049, 0510025022050, 0510025022051, 0510025022052, 0510025022053, 0510025022054, 0510025022055, 0510025022056, 0510025022057, 0510025022058, 0510025022059, 0510025022060, 0510025022061, 0510025022062, 0510025022063, 0510025022064, 0510025022065, 0510025022066, 0510025022067, 0510025022068, 0510025022069, 0510025022070, 0510025022071, 0510025022072, 0510025022073, 0510025022074, 0510025022075, 0510025022076, 0510025022077, 0510025022078, 0510025022079, 0510025022080, 0510025022081, 0510025022082, 0510025022083, 0510025022084, 0510025023000, 0510025023001, 0510025023002, 0510025023003, 0510025023004, 0510025023005, 0510025023006, 0510025023007, 0510025023008, 0510025023009, 0510025023010, 0510025023011, 0510025023012, 0510025023013, 0510025023014, 0510025023015, 0510025023016, 0510025023017, 0510025023018, 0510025023019, 0510025023020, 0510025023021, 0510025023022, 0510025023023, 0510025023024, 0510025023025, 0510025023026, 0510025023027, 0510025023028, 0510025023029, 0510025023030, 0510025023031, 0510025023032, 0510025023033, 0510025023034, 0510025023035, 0510025023036, 0510025031000, 0510025031001, 0510025031002, 0510025031003, 0510025031004, 0510025031005, 0510025031006, 0510025031007, 0510025031008, 0510025031009, 0510025031010, 0510025031011, 0510025031012, 0510025031013, 0510025031014, 0510025031015, 0510025031016, 0510025031017, 0510025031018, 0510025031019, 0510025031020, 0510025031021, 0510025031022, 0510025031023, 0510025031024, 0510025031025, 0510025032000, 0510025032001, 0510025032002, 0510025032003, 0510025032004, 0510025032005, 0510025032006, 0510025032007, 0510025032008, 0510025032009, 0510025033000, 0510025033001, 0510025033002, 0510025033003, 0510025033004, 0510025033005, 0510025033006, 0510025033007, 0510025033008, 0510025033009, 0510025033010, 0510025033011, 0510025033012, 0510025033013, 0510025033014, 0510025033015, 0510025033016, 0510025033017, 0510025033018, 0510025033019, 0510025033020, 0510025033021, 0510025033022, 0510025033023, 0510025033024, 0510025033025, 0510025033026, 0510025033027, 0510025033028, 0510025033029, 0510025033030, 0510025033031, 0510025033032, 0510025033033, 0510025033034, 0510025033035, 0510025041001, 0510025041002, 0510025041003, 0510025041004, 0510025041005, 0510025041006, 0510025041007, 0510025041008, 0510025041009, 0510025041010, 0510025041011, 0510025041012, 0510025041013, 0510025041014, 0510025041015, 0510025041016, 0510025041017, 0510025041018, 0510025041019, 0510025041020, 0510025041021, 0510025041022, 0510025041023, 0510025041024, 0510025041025, 0510025041026, 0510025041027, 0510025041028, 0510025041029, 0510025041030, 0510025042000, 0510025042001, 0510025042002, 0510025042003, 0510025042004, 0510025042005, 0510025042006, 0510025042007, 0510025042008, 0510025042009, 0510025042010, 0510025042011, 0510025042012, 0510025042013, 0510025042014, 0510025042015, 0510025042016, 0510025042017, 0510025042018, 0510025042019, 0510025042020, 0510025042021, 0510025042022, 0510025042023, 0510025042024, 0510025042025, 0510025042026, 0510025042027, 0510025042028, 0510025042029, 0510025042030, 0510025042031, 0510025042032, 0510025042033, 0510025042034, 0510025042035, 0510025042036, 0510025042037, 0510025042038, 0510025042039, 0510025042040, 0510025042041, 0510025042042, 0510025042043, 0510025042044, 0510025042045, 0510025042046, 0510025042047, 0510025043000, 0510025043001, 0510025043002, 0510025043003, 0510025043004, 0510025043005, 0510025043006, 0510025043007, 0510025043008, 0510025043009, 0510025043010, 0510025043011, 0510025043012, 0510025043013, 0510025043014, 0510025043015, 0510025043016, 0510025043017, 0510025043018, 0510025043019, 0510025043020, 0510025043021, 0510025043022, 0510025043023, 0510025043024, 0510025043025, 0510025043026, 0510025043027, 0510025043028, 0510025043029, 0510025043030, 0510025043031, 0510025043032, 0510025043033, 0510025043034, 0510025043035, 0510025043036, 0510025043037, 0510025043038, 0510026002016, 0510037001001, 0510037001002, 0510037001004, 0510037001005, 0510037001006, 0510037001010, 0510037001011, 0510037001012, 0510037001013, 0510037001014, 0510037001015, 0510037001016, 0510037001017, 0510037001018, 0510037001019, 0510037001020, 0510037001021, 0510037001022, 0510037001025, 0510037001026, 0510037003088, 0510037003089, 0510037003090, 0510037003098, 0510037003099, 0510037003100, 0510037003101, 0510037003103, 0510037003104, 0510037003105, 0510037003106, 0510037003107, 0510037003110, 0510037003111, 0510037003112, 0510037003113, 0510037003114, 0519802001027; VTD: G3, VTD: G4, VTD: G6, VTD: G7, VTD: G8: Block(s) 0510016011000, 0510016011028, 0510016011029, 0510016011030, 0510016011031, 0510016011033, 0510016011034, 0510016011035, 0510016011036, 0510016011037, 0510016011038, 0510016011039, 0510016011040, 0510016011042, 0510016012003, 0510016012004, 0510016012005, 0510016012006, 0510016012007, 0510016012008, 0510016012009, 0510016012012, 0510016012013, 0510016012014, 0510016012016, 0510016012017, 0510016012018, 0510016012019, 0510016012020, 0510016012021, 0510016012022, 0510016012023, 0510016012024, 0510016012025, 0510016012026, 0510016012027, 0510016012028, 0510016012029, 0510016012030, 0510016012032, 0510016012033, 0510016012034, 0510016012035, 0510016012036, 0510016012037, 0510016012038, 0510016012039, 0510016012040, 0510016012042, 0510016012043, 0510016012044, 0510016012045, 0510016012046, 0510016012047, 0510016012048, 0510016012049, 0510016012050, 0510016012051, 0510016012052, 0510016012053, 0510016032017, 0510016032018, 0510016032019, 0510016032020, 0510016032022, 0510016032023, 0510016032028, 0510016032029, 0510016032030, 0510016032031, 0510016032032, 0510016032044, 0510019011006, 0510019011007, 0510019011019, 0510019011027, 0510019011040, 0510019031013, 0510019031014, 0510031033002, 0510031033003, 0510031033004, 0510031033005, 0510031033006, 0510031041002, 0510031041003, 0510031041004, 0510031041005, 0510031041006, 0510031041007, 0510031041008, 0510031041009, 0510031041010, 0510031041011, 0510031041012, 0510031041013, 0510031041014, 0510031041015, 0510031042011, 0510032014052, 0510032014053, 0510032014054; VTD: G9, VTD: LI65, VTD: SH77. It has two judges. 0510025022014, 0510025022015, 0510025022016, 0510025022017, 0510025022018, 0510025022019, 0510025022020, 0510025022021, 0510025022022, 0510025022023, 0510025022024, 0510025022025, 0510025022026, 0510025022027, 0510025022028, 0510025022029, 0510025022030, 0510025022031, 0510025022032, 0510025022033, 0510025022034, 0510025022035, 0510025022036, 0510025022037, 0510025022038, 0510025022039, 0510025022040, 0510025022041, 0510025022042, 0510025022043, 0510025022044, 0510025022045, 0510025022046, 0510025022047, 0510025022048, 0510025022049, 0510025022050, 0510025022051, 0510025022052, 0510025022053, 0510025022054, 0510025022055, 0510025022056, 0510025022057, 0510025022058, 0510025022059, 0510025022060, 0510025022061, 0510025022062, 0510025022063, 0510025022064, 0510025022065, 0510025022066, 0510025022067, 0510025022068, 0510025022069, 0510025022070, 0510025022071, 0510025022072, 0510025022073, 0510025022074, 0510025022075, 0510025022076, 0510025022077, 0510025022078, 0510025022079, 0510025022080, 0510025022081, 0510025022082, 0510025022083, 0510025022084, 0510025023000, 0510025023001, 0510025023002, 0510025023003, 0510025023004, 0510025023005, 0510025023006, 0510025023007, 0510025023008, 0510025023009, 0510025023010, 0510025023011, 0510025023012, 0510025023013, 0510025023014, 0510025023015, 0510025023016, 0510025023017, 0510025023018, 0510025023019, 0510025023020, 0510025023021, 0510025023022, 0510025023023, 0510025023024, 0510025023025, 0510025023026, 0510025023027, 0510025023028, 0510025023029, 0510025023030, 0510025023031, 0510025023032, 0510025023033, 0510025023034, 0510025023035, 0510025023036, 0510025031000, 0510025031001, 0510025031002, 0510025031003, 0510025031004, 0510025031005, 0510025031006, 0510025031007, 0510025031008, 0510025031009, 0510025031010, 0510025031011, 0510025031012, 0510025031013, 0510025031014, 0510025031015, 0510025031016, 0510025031017, 0510025031018, 0510025031019, 0510025031020, 0510025031021, 0510025031022, 0510025031023, 0510025031024, 0510025031025, 0510025032000, 0510025032001, 0510025032002, 0510025032003, 0510025032004, 0510025032005, 0510025032006, 0510025032007, 0510025032008, 0510025032009, 0510025033000, 0510025033001, 0510025033002, 0510025033003, 0510025033004, 0510025033005, 0510025033006, 0510025033007, 0510025033008, 0510025033009, 0510025033010, 0510025033011, 0510025033012, 0510025033013, 0510025033014, 0510025033015, 0510025033016, 0510025033017, 0510025033018, 0510025033019, 0510025033020, 0510025033021, 0510025033022, 0510025033023, 0510025033024, 0510025033025, 0510025033026, 0510025033027, 0510025033028, 0510025033029, 0510025033030, 0510025033031, 0510025033032, 0510025033033, 0510025033034, 0510025033035, 0510025041001, 0510025041002, 0510025041003, 0510025041004, 0510025041005, 0510025041006, 0510025041007, 0510025041008, 0510025041009, 0510025041010, 0510025041011, 0510025041012, 0510025041013, 0510025041014, 0510025041015, 0510025041016, 0510025041017, 0510025041018, 0510025041019, 0510025041020, 0510025041021, 0510025041022, 0510025041023, 0510025041024, 0510025041025, 0510025041026, 0510025041027, 0510025041028, 0510025041029, 0510025041030, 0510025042000, 0510025042001, 0510025042002, 0510025042003, 0510025042004, 0510025042005, 0510025042006, 0510025042007, 0510025042008, 0510025042009, 0510025042010, 0510025042011, 0510025042012, 0510025042013, 0510025042014, 0510025042015, 0510025042016, 0510025042017, 0510025042018, 0510025042019, 0510025042020, 0510025042021, 0510025042022, 0510025042023, 0510025042024, 0510025042025, 0510025042026, 0510025042027, 0510025042028, 0510025042029, 0510025042030, 0510025042031, 0510025042032, 0510025042033, 0510025042034, 0510025042035, 0510025042036, 0510025042037, 0510025042038, 0510025042039, 0510025042040, 0510025042041, 0510025042042, 0510025042043, 0510025042044, 0510025042045, 0510025042046, 0510025042047, 0510025043000, 0510025043001, 0510025043002, 0510025043003, 0510025043004, 0510025043005, 0510025043006, 0510025043007, 0510025043008, 0510025043009, 0510025043010, 0510025043011, 0510025043012, 0510025043013, 0510025043014, 0510025043015, 0510025043016, 0510025043017, 0510025043018, 0510025043019, 0510025043020, 0510025043021, 0510025043022, 0510025043023, 0510025043024, 0510025043025, 0510025043026, 0510025043027, 0510025043028, 0510025043029, 0510025043030, 0510025043031, 0510025043032, 0510025043033, 0510025043034, 0510025043035, 0510025043036, 0510025043037, 0510025043038, 0510026002016, 0510037001001, 0510037001002, 0510037001004, 0510037001005, 0510037001006, 0510037001010, 0510037001011, 0510037001012, 0510037001013, 0510037001014, 0510037001015, 0510037001016, 0510037001017, 0510037001018, 0510037001019, 0510037001020, 0510037001021, 0510037001022, 0510037001025, 0510037001026, 0510037003088, 0510037003089, 0510037003090, 0510037003098, 0510037003099, 0510037003100, 0510037003101, 0510037003103, 0510037003104, 0510037003105, 0510037003106, 0510037003107, 0510037003110, 0510037003111, 0510037003112, 0510037003113, 0510037003114, 0519802001027; VTD: G3, VTD: G4, VTD: G6, VTD: G7, VTD: G8: Block(s) 0510016011000, 0510016011028, 0510016011029, 0510016011030, 0510016011031, 0510016011033, 0510016011034, 0510016011035, 0510016011036, 0510016011037, 0510016011038, 0510016011039, 0510016011040, 0510016011042, 0510016012003, 0510016012004, 0510016012005, 0510016012006, 0510016012007, 0510016012008, 0510016012009, 0510016012012, 0510016012013, 0510016012014, 0510016012016, 0510016012017, 0510016012018, 0510016012019, 0510016012020, 0510016012021, 0510016012022, 0510016012023, 0510016012024, 0510016012025, 0510016012026, 0510016012027, 0510016012028, 0510016012029, 0510016012030, 0510016012032, 0510016012033, 0510016012034, 0510016012035, 0510016012036, 0510016012037, 0510016012038, 0510016012039, 0510016012040, 0510016012042, 0510016012043, 0510016012044, 0510016012045, 0510016012046, 0510016012047, 0510016012048, 0510016012049, 0510016012050, 0510016012051, 0510016012052, 0510016012053, 0510016032017, 0510016032018, 0510016032019, 0510016032020, 0510016032022, 0510016032023, 0510016032028, 0510016032029, 0510016032030, 0510016032031, 0510016032032, 0510016032044, 0510019011006, 0510019011007, 0510019011019, 0510019011027, 0510019011040, 0510019031013, 0510019031014, 0510031033002, 0510031033003, 0510031033004, 0510031033005, 0510031033006, 0510031041002, 0510031041003, 0510031041004, 0510031041005, 0510031041006, 0510031041007, 0510031041008, 0510031041009, 0510031041010, 0510031041011, 0510031041012, 0510031041013, 0510031041014, 0510031041015, 0510031042011, 0510032014052, 0510032014053, 0510032014054; VTD: G9, VTD: LI65, VTD: SH77. It has two judges. VTD: G3, VTD: G4, VTD: G6, VTD: G7, VTD: G8: Block(s) 0510016011000, 0510016011028, 0510016011029, 0510016011030, 0510016011031, 0510016011033, 0510016011034, 0510016011035, 0510016011036, 0510016011037, 0510016011038, 0510016011039, 0510016011040, 0510016011042, 0510016012003, 0510016012004, 0510016012005, 0510016012006, 0510016012007, 0510016012008, 0510016012009, 0510016012012, 0510016012013, 0510016012014, 0510016012016, 0510016012017, 0510016012018, 0510016012019, 0510016012020, 0510016012021, 0510016012022, 0510016012023, 0510016012024, 0510016012025, 0510016012026, 0510016012027, 0510016012028, 0510016012029, 0510016012030, 0510016012032, 0510016012033, 0510016012034, 0510016012035, 0510016012036, 0510016012037, 0510016012038, 0510016012039, 0510016012040, 0510016012042, 0510016012043, 0510016012044, 0510016012045, 0510016012046, 0510016012047, 0510016012048, 0510016012049, 0510016012050, 0510016012051, 0510016012052, 0510016012053, 0510016032017, 0510016032018, 0510016032019, 0510016032020, 0510016032022, 0510016032023, 0510016032028, 0510016032029, 0510016032030, 0510016032031, 0510016032032, 0510016032044, 0510019011006, 0510019011007, 0510019011019, 0510019011027, 0510019011040, 0510019031013, 0510019031014, 0510031033002, 0510031033003, 0510031033004, 0510031033005, 0510031033006, 0510031041002, 0510031041003, 0510031041004, 0510031041005, 0510031041006, 0510031041007, 0510031041008, 0510031041009, 0510031041010, 0510031041011, 0510031041012, 0510031041013, 0510031041014, 0510031041015, 0510031042011, 0510032014052, 0510032014053, 0510032014054; VTD: G9, VTD: LI65, VTD: SH77. It has two judges.

District 14A: Durham County: VTD: 09, VTD: 12, VTD: 13, VTD: 14, VTD: 15, VTD: 18, VTD: 31: Block(s) 0630010013033, 0630018024009; VTD: 34, VTD: 35: Block(s) 0630020211023, 0630020212002, 0630020212003, 0630020212004, 0630020212005, 0630020212006, 0630020212007, 0630020212008, 0630020212009, 0630020212010, 0630020212013, 0630020212015, 0630020212016, 0630020212018, 0630020212020, 0630020212021, 0630020272052; VTD: 40, VTD: 41, VTD: 42, VTD: 48, VTD: 53-1, VTD: 54, VTD: 55. It has one judge.

District 14B: Durham County: VTD: 01, VTD: 02, VTD: 03, VTD: 04, VTD: 05, VTD: 06, VTD: 07, VTD: 08, VTD: 10, VTD: 16, VTD: 17, VTD: 19, VTD: 20, VTD: 21, VTD: 22, VTD: 23, VTD: 24, VTD: 25, VTD: 26, VTD: 27, VTD: 28, VTD: 29, VTD: 30-1, VTD: 30-2, VTD: 31: Block(s) 0630010013034, 0630010013038, 0630010013039, 0630010013040, 0630010013043, 0630018071037, 0630018071038, 0630018091000, 0630018091001, 0630018091002, 0630018091003, 0630018091004, 0630018091005, 0630018091006, 0630018091007, 0630018091008, 0630018091009, 0630018091010, 0630018091011, 0630018091012, 0630018091013, 0630018091014, 0630018091015, 0630018091016, 0630018091017, 0630018091018, 0630018091019, 0630018091020, 0630018091021, 0630018091022, 0630018091023, 0630018091024, 0630018091025, 0630018091026, 0630018091027, 0630018091028, 0630018091029, 0630018091030, 0630018091031, 0630018091032, 0630018091033, 0630018091034, 0630018091035, 0630018091036, 0630018091037, 0630018091038, 0630018091041, 0630018091042, 0630018091043, 0630018091044, 0630018091045, 0630018091046, 0630018091062, 0630018091063, 0630018091064, 0630018091065, 0630018091066, 0630018091067, 0630018091071, 0630018091072, 0630018091073, 0630018091074, 0630018091077, 0630018091079, 0630018091080, 0630018092000, 0630018092001, 0630018092002, 0630018092003, 0630018092004, 0630018092005, 0630018092006, 0630018092007, 0630018092008, 0630018092009, 0630018092010, 0630018092011, 0630018092012, 0630018092013, 0630018092014, 0630018092015, 0630018092016, 0630018092017, 0630018092018, 0630018092019, 0630018092020, 0630018092021, 0630018092022, 0630018092023, 0630018092024, 0630018092027, 0630018092028, 0630018092029, 0630018092030, 0630018092031, 0630018092032, 0630018092033, 0630020271000, 0630020271001, 0630020271002, 0630020271003, 0630020271004, 0630020271005, 0630020271006, 0630020271007, 0630020271008, 0630020271009, 0630020271010, 0630020271011, 0630020271012, 0630020271013, 0630020271014, 0630020271015, 0630020271016, 0630020271017, 0630020271018, 0630020271019, 0630020271020, 0630020271021, 0630020271022, 0630020271023, 0630020271024, 0630020271025, 0630020271054, 0630020271055, 0630020271063, 0630020271064, 0630020271065, 0630020271067, 0630020271070, 0630020271071, 0639801001012, 0639801001013; VTD: 32, VTD: 33, VTD: 35: Block(s) 0630020131000, 0630020131001, 0630020131002, 0630020131003, 0630020131004, 0630020131005, 0630020131006, 0630020131007, 0630020131008, 0630020131009, 0630020131010, 0630020131011, 0630020131012, 0630020131013, 0630020131014, 0630020132000, 0630020132001, 0630020132002, 0630020132003, 0630020132004, 0630020132005, 0630020132006, 0630020132007, 0630020132008, 0630020132009, 0630020132010, 0630020132011, 0630020132012, 0630020132013, 0630020132014, 0630020132015, 0630020133000, 0630020133001, 0630020133002, 0630020133003, 0630020133004, 0630020133005, 0630020133006, 0630020133007, 0630020133008, 0630020133009, 0630020133010, 0630020133011, 0630020133012, 0630020133013, 0630020133014, 0630020133015, 0630020133016, 0630020133017, 0630020133018, 0630020133019, 0630020202000, 0630020202001, 0630020202002, 0630020202003, 0630020202004, 0630020202005, 0630020202006, 0630020202007, 0630020202008, 0630020202009, 0630020202010, 0630020202011, 0630020202012, 0630020202013, 0630020202014, 0630020202015, 0630020202016, 0630020202017, 0630020202018, 0630020202019, 0630020202020, 0630020202021, 0630020202022, 0630020202023, 0630020202024, 0630020202025, 0630020202026, 0630020202027, 0630020202028, 0630020202029, 0630020202030, 0630020202031, 0630020202032, 0630020202033, 0630020202034, 0630020202035, 0630020202036, 0630020202037, 0630020202038, 0630020202039, 0630020202040, 0630020202041, 0630020202042, 0630020202043, 0630020202044, 0630020202045, 0630020202046, 0630020202047, 0630020202048, 0630020202049, 0630020202050, 0630020202051, 0630020202052, 0630020202053, 0630020202054, 0630020202055, 0630020202056, 0630020202057, 0630020202058, 0630020211021, 0630020211022, 0630020211024, 0630020211049, 0630020211050, 0630020212011, 0630020212014, 0630020212017, 0630020212019, 0630020272070, 0630020272071, 0630020272072, 0630020272073, 0630020272074, 0630020272075; VTD: 36, VTD: 37, VTD: 38, VTD: 39, VTD: 43, VTD: 44, VTD: 45, VTD: 46, VTD: 47, VTD: 50, VTD: 51, VTD: 52, VTD: 53-2. It has three judges.

District 18A: Guilford County: VTD: FEN1, VTD: FEN2, VTD: G04, VTD: G05, VTD: G06, VTD: G46, VTD: G52, VTD: G67, VTD: G68, VTD: G69, VTD: G70, VTD: G71, VTD: G72, VTD: G73, VTD: G74, VTD: G75, VTD: NCLAY1, VTD: NCLAY2, VTD: PG1, VTD: PG2, VTD: SCLAY. It has one judge.

District 18B: Guilford County: VTD: H01, VTD: H02, VTD: H03, VTD: H04, VTD: H05, VTD: H06, VTD: H07, VTD: H08, VTD: H09, VTD: H10, VTD: H11, VTD: H12, VTD: H13, VTD: H14, VTD: H15, VTD: H16, VTD: H17, VTD: H18, VTD: H19A, VTD: H19B, VTD: H20A, VTD: H20B, VTD: H21, VTD: H22, VTD: H23, VTD: H24, VTD: H25, VTD: H26, VTD: H27, VTD: HP, VTD: JAM1, VTD: JAM5, VTD: NDRI, VTD: SDRI. It has one judge.

District 18C: Guilford County: VTD: CG1, VTD: CG2, VTD: CG3A, VTD: CG3B, VTD: FR1, VTD: FR2, VTD: FR3, VTD: FR4, VTD: FR5, VTD: G17, VTD: G30, VTD: G31, VTD: G32, VTD: G33, VTD: G34, VTD: G36, VTD: G37, VTD: G38, VTD: G39, VTD: G40A1, VTD: G40A2, VTD: G40B, VTD: G41, VTD: G42, VTD: G43, VTD: G64, VTD: G65, VTD: G66, VTD: JAM2, VTD: JAM3, VTD: JAM4, VTD: MON3, VTD: NCGR1, VTD: NCGR2, VTD: OR1, VTD: OR2, VTD: SF1, VTD: SF2, VTD: SF3, VTD: SF4, VTD: STOK. It has one judge.

District 18D: Guilford County: VTD: G01, VTD: G11, VTD: G12, VTD: G13, VTD: G14, VTD: G15, VTD: G16, VTD: G19, VTD: G35, VTD: G44, VTD: G45, VTD: G47, VTD: G48, VTD: G49, VTD: G50, VTD: G51, VTD: G53, VTD: G54, VTD: G55, VTD: G56, VTD: G57, VTD: G58, VTD: G59, VTD: G60, VTD: G61, VTD: G62, VTD: G63, VTD: SUM1, VTD: SUM2, VTD: SUM3, VTD: SUM4. It has one judge.

District 18E: Guilford County: VTD: G02, VTD: G03, VTD: G07, VTD: G08, VTD: G09, VTD: G10, VTD: G18, VTD: G20, VTD: G21, VTD: G22, VTD: G23, VTD: G24, VTD: G25, VTD: G26, VTD: G27, VTD: G28, VTD: G29, VTD: GIB, VTD: GR, VTD: JEF1, VTD: JEF2, VTD: JEF3, VTD: JEF4, VTD: MON1, VTD: MON2, VTD: NMAD, VTD: NWASH, VTD: RC1, VTD: RC2, VTD: SMAD, VTD: SWASH. It has one judge.

District 21A: Forsyth County: VTD: 051, VTD: 052, VTD: 053, VTD: 054, VTD: 055, VTD: 071, VTD: 072, VTD: 073, VTD: 074, VTD: 075, VTD: 091, VTD: 092, VTD: 122, VTD: 123, VTD: 131, VTD: 132, VTD: 133, VTD: 701, VTD: 702, VTD: 703, VTD: 704, VTD: 705, VTD: 706, VTD: 707, VTD: 708, VTD: 709, VTD: 806, VTD: 807, VTD: 808. It has one judge.

District 21B: Forsyth County: VTD: 042, VTD: 043, VTD: 501, VTD: 502, VTD: 503, VTD: 504, VTD: 505, VTD: 506, VTD: 507, VTD: 601, VTD: 602, VTD: 603, VTD: 604, VTD: 605, VTD: 606, VTD: 607, VTD: 901, VTD: 902, VTD: 903, VTD: 904, VTD: 905, VTD: 907. It has one judge.

District 21C: Forsyth County: VTD: 011, VTD: 012, VTD: 013, VTD: 014, VTD: 015, VTD: 021, VTD: 031, VTD: 032, VTD: 033, VTD: 034, VTD: 061, VTD: 062, VTD: 063, VTD: 064, VTD: 065, VTD: 066, VTD: 067, VTD: 068, VTD: 101, VTD: 111, VTD: 112, VTD: 801, VTD: 802, VTD: 803, VTD: 804, VTD: 805, VTD: 809, VTD: 906, VTD: 908, VTD: 909. It has one judge.

District 21D: Forsyth County: VTD: 081, VTD: 082, VTD: 083, VTD: 201, VTD: 203, VTD: 204, VTD: 205, VTD: 206, VTD: 207, VTD: 301, VTD: 302, VTD: 303, VTD: 304, VTD: 305, VTD: 306, VTD: 401, VTD: 402, VTD: 403, VTD: 404, VTD: 405. It has one judge.

District 26A: Mecklenburg County: VTD 001, VTD 008, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 032, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 047, VTD 048, VTD 057, VTD 067, VTD 069, VTD 071, VTD 074, VTD 091, VTD 096, VTD 103, VTD 106, VTD 113, VTD 119, VTD 136, VTD 215, VTD 216, VTD 217, VTD 218, VTD 219, VTD 220, VTD 221, VTD 233, VTD 234, VTD 236. It has one judge.

District 26B: Mecklenburg County: VTD 070, VTD 072, VTD 073, VTD 075, VTD 076, VTD 086, VTD 087, VTD 088, VTD 090, VTD 092, VTD 093, VTD 100, VTD 101, VTD 110, VTD 111, VTD 112, VTD 114, VTD 118, VTD 121, VTD 131, VTD 137, VTD 139.1, VTD 140, VTD 144, VTD 226, VTD 227, VTD 232. It has one judge.

District 26C: Mecklenburg County: VTD 127, VTD 133, VTD 134, VTD 142, VTD 143, VTD 150, VTD 151, VTD 202, VTD 206, VTD 207, VTD 208, VTD 209, VTD 223.1, VTD 224, VTD 240, VTD 241, VTD 242. It has one judge.

District 26D: Mecklenburg County: VTD 037, VTD 038, VTD 049, VTD 050, VTD 051, VTD 058, VTD 059, VTD 077, VTD 097, VTD 098, VTD 120, VTD 122, VTD 129, VTD 138, VTD 147, VTD 148, VTD 225, VTD 228, VTD 229, VTD 230, VTD 231, VTD 243. It has one judge.

District 26E: Mecklenburg County: VTD 002, VTD 005, VTD 007, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 029, VTD 031, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 046, VTD 052, VTD 053, VTD 078.1, VTD 079, VTD 080, VTD 081, VTD 109, VTD 200. It has one judge.

District 26F: Mecklenburg County: VTD 011, VTD 015, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 030, VTD 042, VTD 044, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 056, VTD 082, VTD 089, VTD 128, VTD 135, VTD 210, VTD 211, VTD 213, VTD 214, VTD 222, VTD 238.1. It has one judge.

District 26G: Mecklenburg County: VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 043, VTD 060, VTD 061, VTD 104, VTD 105, VTD 107.1, VTD 123, VTD 126, VTD 132, VTD 141, VTD 145, VTD 146, VTD 149, VTD 204.1, VTD 212, VTD 237, VTD 239. It has one judge.

District 26H: Mecklenburg County: VTD 006, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 045, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 065, VTD 066, VTD 068, VTD 083, VTD 084, VTD 085, VTD 094, VTD 095, VTD 099, VTD 102, VTD 108, VTD 115, VTD 116, VTD 117, VTD 124, VTD 125, VTD 130, VTD 201, VTD 203, VTD 205, VTD 235. It has one judge.

(b1)

The qualified voters of District 4 shall elect all judges established for District 4 in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Onslow County may be candidates for one of the judgeships and only persons who reside in Duplin, Jones, or Sampson County may be candidates for the remaining judgeship.

In subsection (b) above, the names and boundaries of voting tabulation districts, tracts, block groups, and blocks specified in this section are as shown on the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

(c1)

If any voting tabulation district boundary is changed, that change shall not change the boundary of a judicial district, which shall remain the same as it is depicted by the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

(c2)

The Legislative Services Officer shall certify a true copy of the block assignment file associated with any mapping software used to generate the language in subsection (b) of this section. The certified true copy of the block assignment file shall be delivered by the Legislative Services Officer to the Principal Clerk of the Senate and the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives. If any area within North Carolina is not assigned to a specific district by subsection (b) of this section, the certified true copy of the block assignment file delivered to the Principal Clerk of the Senate and the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives shall control.

The several judges, their terms of office, and their assignments to districts are as follows:

In the first superior court district, J. Herbert Small and Thomas S. Watts serve terms expiring December 31, 1994.

In the second superior court district, William C. Griffin serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the third-A superior court district, David E. Reid serves a term expiring on December 31, 1992.

In the third-B superior court district, Herbert O. Phillips, III, serves a term expiring on December 31, 1994.

In the fourth-A superior court district, Henry L. Stevens, III, serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the fourth-B superior court district, James R. Strickland serves a term expiring December 31, 1992.

In the fifth superior court district, no election shall be held in 1992 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Bradford Tillery, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins January 1, 1995. In the fifth superior court district, Napoleon B. Barefoot serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the sixth-A superior court district, Richard B. Allsbrook serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the sixth-B superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the seventh-A superior court district, Charles B. Winberry, serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the seventh-B superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the seventh-C superior court district, Franklin R. Brown serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the eighth-A superior court district, James D. Llewellyn serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the eighth-B superior court district, Paul M. Wright serves a term expiring December 31, 1992.

In the ninth superior court district, Robert H. Hobgood and Henry W. Hight, Jr., serve terms expiring December 31, 1994.

In the tenth-A superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the tenth-B superior court district, Robert L. Farmer serves a term expiring December 31, 1992. In the tenth-B superior court district, no election shall be held in 1990 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Henry V. Barnette, Jr., and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1992 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins January 1, 1993.

In the tenth-C superior court district, Edwin S. Preston, serves a term expiring December 31, 1990. In the tenth-D superior court district, Donald Stephens serves a term expiring December 31, 1988.

In the eleventh superior court district, Wiley F. Bowen serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twelfth-A superior court district, D.B. Herring, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the twelfth-B superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the twelfth-C superior court district, no election shall be held in 1992 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Coy E. Brewer, Jr., and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins January 1, 1995. In the twelfth-C superior court district, E. Lynn Johnson serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the thirteenth superior court district, Giles R. Clark serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the fourteenth-A superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the fourteenth-B superior court district, no election shall be held in 1992 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Anthony M. Brannon, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins July 1, 1995.

In the fourteenth-B superior court district, no election shall be held in 1990 for the full term of the seat now occupied by Thomas H. Lee, and the holder of that seat shall serve until a successor is elected in 1994 and qualifies. The succeeding term begins January 1, 1995. In the fourteenth-B superior court district, J. Milton Read, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the fifteenth-A superior court district, J.B. Allen, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the fifteenth-B superior court district, F. Gordon Battle serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the sixteenth-A superior court district, B. Craig Ellis serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the sixteenth-B superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989. In the sixteenth-B judicial [superior court] district, a judge shall be appointed by the Governor to serve until the results of the 1990 general election are certified. A person shall be elected in the 1990 general election to serve the remainder of the term expiring December 31, 1996.

In the seventeenth-A superior court district, Melzer A. Morgan, Jr., serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the seventeenth-B superior court district, James M. Long serves a term expiring December 31, 1994.

In the eighteenth-A superior court district, a judge shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the eighteenth-B superior court district, Edward K. Washington’s term expired December 31, 1986, but he is holding over because of a court order enjoining an election from being held in 1986. A successor shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.

In the eighteenth-C superior court district, W. Douglas Albright serves a term expiring December 31, 1990.

In the eighteenth-D superior court district, Thomas W. Ross’s term expired December 31, 1986, but he is holding over because of a court order enjoining an election from being held in 1986. A successor shall be elected in 1988 to serve an eight-year term beginning January 1, 1989.
